Oklahoma, session 2026, SB750.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-122.4 of Title 47, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma Department of Emergency Management shall
promulgate rules to create the Canine Cooperative Grant Program to
provide financial assistance to state, county, and municipal law
enforcement entities and fire departments for the acquisition and
training of law enforcement canines and search, rescue, and recovery
canines and medical expenses for the canines related to injuries
sustained while in the line of service; provided, canines shall be
trained in accordance with state law and agency standards and shall
be specifically allocated for law enforcement officers and fire
departments.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB750 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Oklahoma Department of Emergency Management to be
designated the “Canine Cooperative Grant Program Revolving Fund”.
The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year
limitations, and shall consist of all monies received from
legislative appropriations, private donations, and federal grant
programs. All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby
appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the Oklahoma
Department of Emergency Management for the administration of the
Canine Cooperative Grant Program. Expenditures from the fund shall
be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims
filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
C. The Oklahoma Department of Emergency Management may retain
five percent (5%) of the proceeds of the fund annually to be used
for the administration of the program.
D. Subject to the availability of funds, the program shall have
the following annual limits for grants:
1. Grants not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) per
county sheriff for canine purchases or canine training;
2. Grants not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) per
municipal police department for canine purchases or canine training;
and

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB750 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. Grants not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) per
fire department for canine purchases or canine training.
E. Subject to the availability of funds, the program shall make
grants for the reimbursement of medical expenses for canines injured
in the line of service with state, county, or municipal law
enforcement or a fire department.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS
March 5, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED
















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB750 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)